North Carolina, session 2025, SB178.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-284 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-284. Uniform assessment standard.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all property, real and personal, shall be
assessed for taxation at its true value or use value as determined under G.S. 105-283 or
G.S. 105-277.6, and taxes levied by all counties and municipalities shall be levied uniformly on
assessments determined in accordance with this section.
…
(e) The assessed value of self-service storage facility property is taxable in accordance
with this subsection. As used in this subsection, "self-service storage facility" has the same
definition as provided in G.S. 44A-40. The assessed value of self-service storage facility property
shall be determined based upon the land on which the facility is situated and any improvements
thereon, less normal depreciation and obsolescence, and exclusive of business intangible value.
For purposes of this subsection, "business intangible value" is any value in excess of the
depreciated replacement cost of the improvements and the value of the land."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2026.
*S178-v-1*